Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-20,181
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Foreign corporation; revocation of certificate of authority; reinstatement denied; appeal.

(1) If the Secretary of State denies a foreign corporation's application for reinstatement following revocation of its certificate of authority under section 21-20,180, he or she shall serve the foreign corporation under section 21-20,177 with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

(2) The foreign corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the district court of Lancaster County within thirty days after service of the notice of denial is perfected under section 21-20,177. The foreign corporation shall appeal by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State's certificate of revocation, the foreign corporation's application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State's notice of denial.

(3) The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the certificate of authority or may take any other action the court considers appropriate.

(4) The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 181;

Laws 1996, LB 1036, § 7.